Massachusetts, session 194th, S324.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 69 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 36 the
following sections:-
SECTION 37.
SCHOOL SEGREGATION DATA COLLECTION
(a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings:-
“Diverse school”, a school in which no single racial subgroup of students accounts for
more than 70 per cent of the total student population and at least 25 per cent of the student
population is White.
of 9

“Diverse district”, a school district in which no single racial subgroup of students
accounts for more than 70 per cent of the total student population and at least 25 per cent of the
student population is White.
“Intensely segregated district”, a school district in which (i) a single racial subgroup
accounts for 90 per cent or more of the student population; or (ii) 10 per cent or less of the
student population is White.
“Intensely segregated school”, a school in which (i) a single racial subgroup accounts for
90 per cent or more of the student population; or (ii) 10 per cent or less of the student population
is White.
“Racially disproportionate school”, a school in which (i) the White student population
differs by at least 15 percentage points as compared to the percentage of White students in the
district which the school is a part of; or (ii) a school in which less than 25 per cent of the school
population is White and the student population of a racial subgroup differs by at least 15
percentage points as compared to the percentage of said racial subgroup in the district of which
the school is a part.
“Segregated district”, a school district that does not meet the criteria of either a diverse
district or an intensely segregated district.
“Segregated school”, a school that does not meet the criteria of either a diverse school or
intensely segregated school.
of 9

(b) Annually, the department of elementary and secondary education shall publicly report
and place on its website the following information for all public schools and districts within the
commonwealth:
(1) An identification of a public school as a: (i) diverse school; (ii) segregated school; or
(iii) intensely segregated school.
(2) A quantifiable, comparable measure of school-level segregation used to determine the
category of each school as specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) An identification of a public school districts as a: (i) diverse district; (ii) segregated
district; or (iii) intensely segregated district.
(4) A quantifiable, comparable measure of district-level segregation used to determine the
category of each school as specified in paragraph (3) of this subsection.
(5) An identification of whether a school is a racially disproportionate school.
(6) A quantifiable, comparable measure of intradistrict segregation used to determine
whether a school is a racially disproportionate school as specified in paragraph (5) of this
subsection.
(7) A quantifiable, comparable measure to compare the proportionality of the racial
composition of the total student population of a school or district as compared to the racial
composition of students in said school or district that completed the SAT or ACT.
(8) A quantifiable, comparable measure to compare the proportionality of the racial
composition of the total population of a school or district as compared to the racial composition
of students enrolled in: (i) not less than 1 advanced placement course; (ii) a chemistry course;
of 9

(iii) a biology course; (iv) a geometry course; (v) a calculus course; (vi) an eighth grade algebra
course; (vii) an advanced math course; (viii) a gifted and talented program; and (ix) if applicable,
a designated early college pathway.
(c) The department of elementary and secondary education may establish reasonable
limits on public reporting of data for the sole purposes of (i) protecting the identities of
individual students or (ii) to maintain the statistical integrity of data, provided that such limits are
consistent with the existing policies and procedures of the department.
SECTION 38.
SCHOOL INTEGRATION GRANT PROGRAM
The department of elementary and secondary education shall establish a grant program,
subject to appropriation, to be known as the school diversity and integration grant program for
the development, implementation, and evaluation of comprehensive strategies in school districts
to combat the effects of racial segregation by increasing racial diversity of the student
population.
(a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings:-
“Eligible entity”, a public school district or consortium of public school districts in a
region that at the time of the application has significant achievement gaps or racial segregation
within or between the school districts served by such entity.
(b) The department of elementary and secondary education may reserve up to 10 per cent
of appropriated funds for (i) research, development, data collection, monitoring, technical
assistance, evaluation, or dissemination activities; (ii) the development and dissemination of best
of 9

practices to increase racial diversity in schools; and (iii) in the case in which a grantee uses race
as a factor in developing a process for achieving racially integrated schools, technical assistance
to grantees to develop narrowly tailored plans to achieve the benefits of racial diversity.
(c) The department shall award grants on a competitive basis to eligible entities to
develop or implement plans to improve student diversity and reduce or eliminate racial
segregation. The department may, in any fiscal year, award: (i) planning grants; (ii)
implementation grants; or (iii) both planning and implementation grants.
(1) A planning grant awarded under this section shall be for a period of not more than 1
year.
(2) Each eligible entity that receives a planning grant shall use the grant to support
students in schools through the following activities: (i) completing a comprehensive assessment
of, with respect to the geographic area served, (A) the educational outcomes and racial
segregation of children attending schools; (B) an analysis of the location and capacity of program
and school facilities and the adequacy of local or regional transportation infrastructure; and (C)
an analysis of whether the local housing stock is adequately diverse and whether local land-use
and zoning practices allow for racial diversity; (ii) developing and implementing a robust family,
student, and community engagement plan, including public hearings or other open forums that
would precede and inform the development of a formal strategy to improve diversity in schools;
provided, however, that such engagement shall include meaningful engagement of students and
families of color; (iii) developing options, including timelines and cost estimates, for improving
diversity in schools, such as weighted lotteries, revised feeder patterns, school boundary
redesign, or regional coordination; (iv) developing an implementation plan based on community
of 9

preferences among the options developed; (v) building the capacity to collect and analyze data
that provide information for transparency, continuous improvement, and evaluation; (vi)
developing plans for creating a racially inclusive school climate with respect to racially and
culturally curriculum, school discipline policies and practices, and teacher and school leader
diversity; (vii) if applicable, developing an implementation plan to comply with a court-ordered
school desegregation plan; and (viii) if applicable, developing an implementation plan to replace
entrance exams or other competitive application procedures with alternate methods of student
assignment to promote racial diversity.
100 (3) An implementation grant awarded under this section shall be for a period of not more
101 than 3 years, except that the department may extend an implementation grant for an additional 2-
102 year period if the eligible entity receiving the grant demonstrates to the department that the
103 eligible entity is making significant progress, as determined by the department, on the program
104 performance measures described in subsection (g).
105 (4) Each eligible entity that receives an implementation grant shall implement a high-
106 quality plan to support students in schools that includes: (i) a comprehensive set of strategies
107 designed to improve academic outcomes for all students, particularly students of color, by
108 increasing student diversity; (ii) evidence of strong family and community support for such
109 strategies, including evidence that the eligible entity has engaged in meaningful family and
110 community outreach activities with students and families of color; (iii) goals to increase student
111 diversity; (iv) collection and analysis of data to provide transparency and support continuous
112 improvement; and (v) a rigorous method of evaluation of the effectiveness of the program.
of 9

113 (5) Each eligible entity that receives an implementation grant may use the grant to carry
114 out one or more of the following activities: (i) recruiting, hiring, or training additional teachers,
115 administrators, school counselors, and other instructional and support staff in new, expanded, or
116 restructured schools, or other professional development activities for staff and administrators;
117 provided, however, that the hiring of such individuals directly relate to the implementation of a
118 school integration program under this section; (ii) investing in specialized academic programs or
119 facilities designed to encourage inter-district school attendance patterns; (iii) developing or
120 initiating a transportation plan for bringing students to and from schools; (iv) developing
121 innovative and equitable school assignment plans; (v) carrying out innovative activities designed
122 to increase racial diversity and engagement between children from different racial backgrounds;
123 (vi) creating or improving systems and partnerships to create an enrollment process for students
124 with multiple public school options, including making school information and data more
125 accessible and easy to understand, in order to ensure access to high-quality schools for students
126 of color and to promote racial diversity; or (vii) carrying out plans to improve access to a
127 rigorous curriculum for all students through the elimination of tracking or ability grouping
128 students in class assignment.
129 (d) The department shall award grants based on: (i) the quality of the application
130 submitted by an eligible entity; (ii) the likelihood, as determined by the department, that the
131 eligible entity will use the grant to improving academic and other developmental or noncognitive
132 outcomes for students; and (iii) the likelihood that the grant will lead to a meaningful reduction
133 in racial segregation for students.
134 (e) In awarding grants under this section, the department shall give priority to the
135 following eligible entities: (i) first, to an eligible entity that proposes to use the grant to support a
of 9

136 program that extends beyond one school district, such as an inter-district or regional program;
137 and (ii) second, to an eligible entity that demonstrates meaningful coordination with local or
138 regional housing or transportation agencies.
139 (f) In order to receive a grant, an eligible entity shall submit an application to the
140 department at such time and in such manner as the department may require. Such application
141 shall include: (i) a description of the program for which the eligible entity is seeking a grant,
142 including: (A) how the eligible entity proposes to use the grant to improve the academic and life
143 outcomes of students in racially segregated schools by supporting interventions that increase
144 diversity for students in such schools; (B) in the case of an implementation grant, the
145 implementation grant plan described in paragraph (4) of subsection (c); and (C) evidence, or if
146 such evidence is not available, a rationale based on current research, regarding how the program
147 will increase diversity; (ii) how the eligible entity will identify and define racial segregation and
148 racial diversity; (iii) a description of the plan of the eligible entity for continuing the program
149 after the grant period ends; (iv) a description of how the eligible entity will assess, monitor, and
150 evaluate the impact of the activities funded under the grant on student achievement and student
151 enrollment diversity; (v) an assurance that the eligible entity has conducted, or will conduct,
152 robust family and community engagement, provided that engagement: (A) shall be in a language
153 that families and students can understand; (B) shall include engagement with students and
154 families of color in the targeted district or region; and (C); shall be designed to remove barriers
155 to ensure participation of students and families in the planning and development of any formal
156 strategy to increase diversity; (vi) an estimate of the number of students that the eligible entity
157 plans to serve under the program and the number of students to be served through additional
158 expansion of the program after the grant period ends; (vii) an assurance that the eligible entity
of 9

159 will: (A) cooperate with the department in evaluating the program; and (B) engage in a
160 community of practice as described in subsection (i); (ix) in the case of an eligible entity
161 applying for an implementation grant, a description of how the eligible entity will implement,
162 replicate, or expand a strategy based on an appropriate level of evidence, as determined by the
163 department, or test a promising strategy to increase diversity in schools; (x) in the case of an
164 application by a consortium of local educational agencies, how the grant funds will be divided
165 among the school districts served by such consortium.
166 (g) The department shall establish performance measures for the programs and activities
167 carried out through grants. These measures shall track the progress of each eligible entity in (i)
168 increasing diversity and decreasing racial segregation in schools; and (ii) improving academic
169 and other developmental or noncognitive outcomes for each racial subgroup of students that the
170 department or eligible entity may identify.
171 (h) The department may establish annual reporting requirements of grantees as it deems
172 appropriate for the implementation of this section.
173 (i) The department shall establish a professional learning community, which shall consist
174 of grantees and staff that the department may reasonably furnish for technical assistance in
175 developing strategies related to the purposes of this grant program.
176 (1) The professional learning community shall meet regularly to promote the
177 development of shared best practices for the planning and implementation of grants under this
178 section.
of 9